Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
TYPES OF MEMBERSHIPS - MEMBERS'
RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS

7-126-201. Differences in rights and obligations of members.

Unless otherwise provided by articles 121 to 137 of this title or the bylaws:

All voting members shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to voting and all other matters that articles 121 to 137 of this title specifically reserve to voting members; and

With respect to matters not so reserved, all members, including voting members, shall have the same rights and obligations.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 671, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-126-202. Transfers.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, no member of a nonprofit corporation may transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom.

Where transfer rights have been provided, no restriction on them shall be binding with respect to a member holding a membership issued prior to the adoption of the restriction unless the restriction is approved by the affected member.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 671, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-126-203. Creditor's action against member.

No proceeding may be brought by a creditor to reach the liability, if any, of a member to the nonprofit corporation unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the nonprofit corporation and execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless such proceeding would be useless.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 672, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.